Missouri, session 2026, HB3233.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 8, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 8.995, to read as follows:
8.995. 1. Wearing a mask or otherwise covering one's face shall be prohibited at
any assembly occurring in or on the grounds of a public building.
2. The provisions of this section shall not apply to:
(1) A mask or facial covering for the purpose of ensuring one's physical health
and safety or the health and safety of others including, but not limited to, limiting the
spread of airborne illnesses; or
(2) A mask or facial covering worn for religious purposes.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.